Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.100

Liabilities and rights of members of firm.

In all cases not otherwise provided for in this chapter, all the members of limited partnerships shall be subject to all the liabilities and entitled to all the rights of general partners.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.100. Prior: 1869 p 382 s 10; RRS s 9975.]